Hawaii statutes.
§10-30 Payment and security of revenue
bonds; revenue bonds not a debt of the State. Revenue bonds issued under
this part shall be payable from and secured solely by the revenues of the
office project or projects, the revenues of the loan program or programs, or
revenues of the office pledged to the payment thereof, or both, and those
revenues shall be applied to the payment in accordance with the provisions of
this part and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of the
revenue bonds. No holder or holders of any revenue bonds issued under this
part shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the
State or the making of any appropriation to pay the revenue bonds, or interest
thereon. Each revenue bond shall recite in substance that the revenue bond,
including interest thereon, is payable solely from and secured by the revenue
pledged to the payment thereof, and that the bond does not constitute a general
or moral obligation or indebtedness of the State within the meaning of any law.
[L 1994, c 283, pt of §2(2); am L 2009, c 146, §8; am L 2013, c 171, §10]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next